Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.070

College board—Organization—Meetings—Quorum—Biennial report—Fiscal year.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1486-S.SL) ***

The governor shall make the appointments to the college board.

The college board shall organize, adopt a seal, and adopt bylaws for its administration, not inconsistent herewith, as it may deem expedient and may from time to time amend such bylaws. Annually the board shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson; all to serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. The college board shall at its initial meeting fix a date and place for its regular meeting. Five members shall constitute a quorum, and no meeting shall be held with less than a quorum present, and no action shall be taken by less than a majority of the college board.

Special meetings may be called as provided by its rules and regulations. Regular meetings shall be held at the college board's established offices in Olympia, but whenever the convenience of the public or of the parties may be promoted, or delay or expenses may be prevented, it may hold its meetings, hearings or proceedings at any other place designated by it. Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the college board shall transmit a report in writing to the governor biennially which report shall contain such information as may be requested by the governor. The fiscal year of the college board shall conform to the fiscal year of the state.

[1987 c 505 s 15; 1986 c 130 s 1; 1977 c 75 s 26; 1973 c 62 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.070. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 7. Formerly RCW 28.85.070.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

Fiscal year defined: RCW 43.88.020.